el: Συμβατός τύπος έγχυσης: Με καρμπιρατέρ; Common rail diesel; Άμεσος ψεκασμός βενζίνης; Μηχανικός ψεκασμός diesel; Ψεκασμός πολλαπλών σημείων; Ψεκασμός στους αυλούς εισαγωγής; Ψεκασμός στην πεταλούδα γκαζιού; Unit injector; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
ja: 対応インジェクションタイプ: キャブレター; コモンレール式ディーゼル; ガソリン直噴; 機械式ディーゼル噴射; マルチポート噴射; ポート燃料噴射; スロットルボディ噴射; ユニットインジェクター; ユニバーサル; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de injeção compatível: Com carburador; Common rail a gasóleo; Injeção direta a gasolina; Injeção mecânica a gasóleo; Injeção multiponto; Injeção indireta de combustível; Injeção de corpo de borboleta; Injetor-bomba; Universal; Outro
sv: Kompatibel insprutstyp: Förgasare; Common rail-diesel; Direktinsprutning (bensin); Mekanisk dieselinsprutning; Flerpunktsinsprutning; Kanalinsprutning; Centralinsprutning; Pumpinjektor; Universell; Övrigt
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta mlaznice: S rasplinjačem; Common rail dizel; Izravno ubrizgavanje benzina; Mehaničko ubrizgavanje dizela; Multi-port ubrizgavanje; Port fuel ubrizgavanje; Ubrizgavanje u kućište leptiraste zaklopke; Pumpa-brizgaljka; Univerzalno; Ostalo
pl: Kompatybilny typ wtrysku: Gaźnikowy; Diesel Common Rail; Bezpośredni wtrysk benzyny; Mechaniczny wtrysk diesla; Wielopunktowy wtrysk paliwa; Wtrysk do kanału dolotowego; Jednopunktowy wtrysk paliwa; Pompowtryskiwacz; Uniwersalny; Inne
es: Tipo de inyección compatible: Carburado; Diésel common rail; Inyección directa de gasolina; Inyección mecánica diésel; Inyección multipunto; Inyección de combustible en puerto; Inyección en el cuerpo del acelerador; Inyector bomba; Universal; Otro
pt-BR: Tipo de injeção compatível: Carburado; Diesel common rail; Injeção direta de gasolina; Injeção mecânica a diesel; Injeção multiponto; Injeção de combustível na porta; Injeção monoponto (TBI); Unidade injetora; Universal; Outro
it: Tipo di iniezione compatibile: A carburatore; Diesel common rail; Iniezione diretta di benzina; Iniezione meccanica diesel; Iniezione multipoint; Iniezione indiretta (PFI); Iniezione single-point (TBI); Iniettore-pompa; Universale; Altro
zh-TW: 相容的燃油噴射類型: 化油器; 共軌柴油; 汽油缸內直噴; 機械式柴油噴射; 多點噴射; 進氣道噴射; 節流閥體噴射; 泵噴嘴; 通用; 其他
en: Compatible injection type: Carbureted; Common rail diesel; Gasoline direct injection; Mechanical diesel injection; Multi port injection; Port fuel injection; Throttle body injection; Unit injector; Universal; Other
tr: Uyumlu enjeksiyon tipi: Karbüratörlü; Ortak yakıt yollu dizel; Benzinli doğrudan enjeksiyon; Mekanik dizel enjeksiyonu; Çok portlu enjeksiyon; Port yakıt enjeksiyonu; Gaz kelebeği gövdesi enjeksiyonu; Birim enjektör; Evrensel; Diğer
de: Kompatibler Einspritztyp: Vergaser; Common-Rail-Diesel; Benzindirekteinspritzung; Mechanische Dieseleinspritzung; Multipoint-Einspritzung; Saugrohreinspritzung; Zentraleinspritzung; Pumpe-Düse-System; Universal; Sonstige
cs: Kompatibilní typ vstřikování: Karburátor; Common rail (diesel); Přímé vstřikování benzínu; Mechanické vstřikování (diesel); Vícebodové vstřikování; Nepřímé vstřikování (do sacího kanálu); Jednobodové vstřikování (TBI); Systém čerpadlo-tryska; Univerzální; Jiné
nb: Kompatibel injeksjonstype: Forgasser; Common rail-diesel; Direkte bensininnsprøytning; Mekanisk dieselinnsprøytning; Flerpunktsinnsprøytning; Portinnsprøytning; Spjeldhusinnsprøytning; Pumpe-dyse; Universell; Annet
fi: Yhteensopiva ruiskutustyyppi: Kaasutin; Common rail -diesel; Bensiinin suorasuihkutus; Mekaaninen dieselruiskutus; Monipisteruiskutus; Imusarjasuihkutus; Yksipisteruiskutus; Pumppusuutin; Yleinen; Muu
da: Kompatibel indsprøjtningstype: Med karburator; Commonrail-diesel; Direkte benzinindsprøjtning; Mekanisk dieselindsprøjtning; Flerpunktsindsprøjtning; Indsprøjtning i indsugningskanal; Centralindsprøjtning; Pumpedyse; Universel; Andet
nl: Compatibel injectietype: Carburateur; Common-raildiesel; Directe benzine-injectie; Mechanische dieselinjectie; Multi-port-injectie; Indirecte brandstofinjectie; Throttle-body-injectie; Pompverstuiver; Universeel; Overig
ru: Совместимый тип впрыска: Карбюраторный; Дизельный Common Rail; Прямой впрыск бензина; Механический впрыск дизеля; Многоточечный впрыск; Распределенный впрыск; Моновпрыск; Насос-форсунка; Универсальный; Другое
ro-RO: Tip de injecție compatibil: Cu carburator; Diesel Common rail; Injecție directă pe benzină; Injecție mecanică diesel; Injecție multi-punct; Injecție în galeria de admisie; Injecție monopunct; Pompă-injector; Universal; Altele
zh-CN: 适用喷油嘴类型: 化油器; 高压共轨柴油; 汽油直喷 (GDI); 机械柴油喷射; 多点喷射; 进气道喷射; 节气门体喷射; 泵喷嘴; 通用; 其他
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ vstrekovania: Karburátorové; Naftové (common rail); Priame vstrekovanie benzínu; Mechanické vstrekovanie nafty; Viacbodové vstrekovanie; Nepriame vstrekovanie paliva; Jednobodové vstrekovanie (TBI); Systém čerpadlo-tryska; Univerzálne; Iné
th: ประเภทหัวฉีดที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: คาร์บูเรเตอร์; คอมมอนเรลดีเซล; ฉีดตรงเบนซิน; ฉีดดีเซลแบบกลไก; ฉีดหลายจุด; ฉีดเชื้อเพลิงพอร์ต; ฉีดพอร์ตลิ้นปีกผีเสื้อ; หัวฉีดแบบยูนิต; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
ko: 호환 주사 유형: 기화기식; 커먼레일 디젤; 가솔린 직분사; 기계식 디젤 분사; 다중 포트 분사; 포트 연료 분사; 스로틀 바디 분사; 유닛 인젝터; 범용; 기타
bg-BG: Съвместим тип впръскване: С карбуратор; Common rail дизел; Бензинов двигател с директно впръскване; Механично дизелово впръскване; Многоточково впръскване; Впръскване във всмукателния колектор; Моноточково впръскване (TBI); Помпа-дюза; Универсално; Друго
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta vbrizgavanja: Vplinjač; Dizelski motor s skupnim vodom (common rail); Neposredni vbrizg bencina; Mehanski vbrizg dizla; Večtočkovni vbrizg (multi-port); Vbrizg goriva v sesalno cev (port injection); Centralni vbrizg (throttle body); Sistem črpalka-šoba (unit injector); Univerzalno; Drugo
lt-LT: Suderinamas įpurškimo tipas: Karbiuratorinis; „Common rail“ dyzelinis; Tiesioginis benzino įpurškimas; Mechaninis dyzelino įpurškimas; Daugiataškis įpurškimas; Įpurškimas į įsiurbimo kolektorių; Centrinis įpurškimas; Purkštukas-siurblys; Universalus; Kita
hu: Kompatibilis befecskendezési típus: Karburátoros; Common rail dízel; Közvetlen benzinbefecskendezéses; Mechanikus dízelbefecskendezéses; Többpontos befecskendezéses; Szívócső-befecskendezéses; Központi befecskendezéses; Adagolófúvókás; Univerzális; Egyéb
vi: Kiểu phun nhiên liệu tương thích: Bộ chế hòa khí; Diesel ống dẫn chung; Phun xăng trực tiếp; Phun diesel cơ học; Phun đa điểm; Phun nhiên liệu tại cửa nạp; Phun qua bướm ga; Phun kết hợp; Phổ thông; Khác
fr: Type d’injection compatible: À carburateur; Diesel à rampe commune; Injection directe d'essence; Injection mécanique diesel; Injection multipoint; Injection indirecte; Injection monopoint; Injecteur-pompe; Universel; Autre